Utah statutes.
16-6a-1515.   Grounds for revocation.

The division may commence a proceeding under Section 16-6a-1516 to revoke the authority of a foreign nonprofit corporation to conduct affairs in this state if:

(1)  the foreign nonprofit corporation does not deliver its annual report to the division when it is due;

(2)  the foreign nonprofit corporation does not pay when they are due any taxes, fees, or penalties imposed by this chapter or other applicable laws of this state;

(3)  the foreign nonprofit corporation is without a registered agent in this state;

(4)  the foreign nonprofit corporation does not inform the division by an appropriate filing, within 30 days of the change or resignation, that:

(a)  its registered agent has changed; or

(b)  its registered agent has resigned;

(5)  an incorporator, director, officer, or agent of the foreign nonprofit corporation signs a document knowing it is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the division for filing; or

(6)  the division receives a duly authenticated certificate from the division or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law the foreign nonprofit corporation is incorporated stating that the foreign nonprofit corporation has dissolved or disappeared as the result of a merger.



Amended by Chapter 364, 2008 General Session

